Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Cooperative unit facilities grants. new text end new text begin (a) For cooperative unit facilities grants: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 10,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) A cooperative unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 123A.24, subdivision 2, that is organized to provide special education services or career and technical education is eligible to apply for a facilities grant under this subdivision. An eligible applicant may apply to the commissioner in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) Eligible uses of the grant money awarded include any purpose authorized under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.10, subdivision 14, clauses (1) to (12). new text end new text begin (d) Each grant award must not exceed $2,000,000. new text end new text begin (e) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to ... percent of the appropriation is available for grant administration. new text end